District of Columbia statutes.
47-1089

Jubilee Housing Limited Partnership Residential Rental Project; Lots 62, 63, and 809, Square 2576, and Lot 818, Square 2566.

Beginning October 1, 2012, the real properties described as Lots 62, 63, and 809, Square 2576, and Lot 818, Square 2566, owned by Jubilee Housing, Inc., or by Jubilee Housing Limited Partnership, shall be exempt from real property taxation so long as the real properties continue to be owned by Jubilee Housing, Inc., or Jubilee Housing Limited Partnership, and continue to be under applicable use restrictions during a federal low-income housing tax credit compliance period, and not used for commercial purposes, subject to the provisions of §§ 47-1005, 47-1007, and 47-1009.

Dec. 24, 2013, D.C. Law 20-61, § 7272(b), 60 DCR 12472
June 26, 2014, D.C. Law 20-117, § 8(b), 61 DCR 2032

History

The 2014 amendment by D.C. Law 20-117 substituted “2012” for “2013”.

Effect of Amendments

For temporary (90 days) addition of this section, see § 7272 of the Fiscal Year 2014 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-204, October 17, 2013, 60 DCR 15341, 20 DCSTAT 2455).

Emergency Legislation

Section 7271 of D.C. Law 20-61 provided that Subtitle AA of Title VII of the act may be cited as the “Jubilee Housing Residential Rental Project Property Tax Exemption and Equitable Real Property Tax Relief Act of 2013”.

Short Title

Editor's Notes

Applicability of D.C. Law 20-61: Section 7273 of D.C. Law 20-61 provided that § 7272 of the act shall apply as of October 1, 2012.

Applicability of D.C. Law 20-117: Section 18 of D.C. Law 20-117 provided that the act shall apply as of October 1, 2013.